Wyoming, session 2026, HB0092.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-104 is created to read:
9-1-104. Qualifications for office; ineligibility of
candidates convicted of certain sex offenses.
(a) In addition to any other qualifications to hold
public office, no sex offender shall be eligible to be a
candidate for, or be appointed to, any of the following
offices:
(i) Trustee of a school district;
(ii) Community college district board member;
(iii) County attorney or district attorney;
(iv) County commissioner;
(v) Member of the governing body of a city or
town;
(vi) Mayor of a city or town;
(vii) County sheriff;
(viii) Any office of an elected statewide
official;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0092
ENROLLED ACT NO. 37, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ix) Member of the legislature;
(x) Member of the board of trustees of the
University of Wyoming;
(xi) Clerk of district court;
(xii) Member of the state board of education;
(xiii) County clerk;
(xiv) County treasurer;
(xv) County coroner;
(xvi) City attorney.
(b) The secretary of state, county clerk or other
appropriate election official shall refuse to certify a
candidate's name if the candidate is ineligible to hold
public office under this section. If a person in office is
disqualified from office under this section, the office
shall be deemed vacant as provided in W.S.
22-18-101(a)(iv).
(c) As used in this section, "sex offender" means a
person who is currently registered on the central registry
of offenders under W.S. 7-19-301 through 7-19-310.
Section 2. This act shall apply to any person elected
or appointed to public office on or after July 1, 2026.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0092
ENROLLED ACT NO. 37, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3